Utah statutes.
78B-14-605 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Notice of registration of order.

(1)  When a support order or income-withholding order issued in another state is registered, the registering tribunal shall notify the nonregistering party.  The notice must be accompanied by a copy of the registered order and the documents and relevant information accompanying the order.

(2)  A notice must inform the nonregistering party:

(a)  that a registered order is enforceable as of the date of registration in the same manner as an order issued by a tribunal of this state;

(b)  that a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order must be requested within 20 days after the date of mailing or personal service of the notice;

(c)  that failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order in a timely manner will result in confirmation of the order and enforcement of the order and the alleged arrearages and precludes further contest of that order with respect to any matter that could have been asserted; and

(d)  of the amount of any alleged arrearages.

(3)  If the registering party asserts that two or more orders are in effect, a notice must also:

(a)  identify the two or more orders and the order alleged by the registering person to be the controlling order and the consolidated arrears, if any;

(b)  notify the nonregistering party of the right to a determination of which is the controlling order;

(c)  state that the procedures provided in Subsection (2) apply to the determination of which is the controlling order; and

(d)  state that failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the order alleged to be the controlling order in a timely manner may result in confirmation that the order is the controlling order.

(4)  Upon registration of an income-withholding order for enforcement, the registering tribunal shall notify the obligor's employer pursuant to Title 62A, Chapter 11, Part 4, Income Withholding In IV-D Cases.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

